Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201285-2409
Postsecondary institution; charge
for tuition or fees; loans; prohibited acts.

No postsecondary
institution with an authorization to operate
under the Postsecondary Institution Act shall charge tuition or fees for more
than one academic term or require a student to sign loan documents for more
than one academic year.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 9;

Laws 2012, LB1104, § 17.
July 19, 2012